Nebraska, session 109, LB804.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB804 LB804
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Communication includes any oral communication, note, record, or
report;
(b) Emergency services personnel means any employee or volunteer of
an emergency services provider who is engaged in providing or supporting
firefighting, dispatching services, and emergency medical services;
(c) Emergency services provider means any public employer that
employs people to provide firefighting, dispatching services, or
emergency medical services;
(d) Employee assistance program means a program established by a
law enforcement agency, emergency services provider, or the Nebraska
National Guard to provide professional counseling or support services to
a law enforcement officer, emergency services personnel, or Nebraska
National Guard member;
(e) Law enforcement agency has the same meaning as in section
81-1401;
(f) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section
81-1401;
(g) Peer support counseling session means any session conducted by
a peer support specialist that is called or requested in response to a
critical incident or traumatic event involving the personnel of a law
enforcement agency, emergency services provider, or the Nebraska National
Guard;
(h) Peer support specialist means a person:
(i) Designated by a law enforcement agency, an emergency services
provider, the Nebraska National Guard, an employee assistance program, or
a peer support team leader to lead, moderate, or assist in a peer support
counseling session;
(ii) Who is a member of a peer support team; and
(iii) Who has received training in counseling and providing
emotional and moral support to a law enforcement officer, emergency
-2-

LB804 LB804
2026 2026
services personnel, or Nebraska National Guard member who has been
involved in an emotionally traumatic incident by reason of his or her
employment; and
(i) Peer support team means a group of peer support specialists
serving a law enforcement agency, emergency services provider, or the
Nebraska National Guard.
(2) Any communication shall be confidential and shall not be
disclosed by any person participating in a peer support counseling
session if:
(a) Made by a participant or peer support specialist in a peer
support counseling session pursuant to this section; or
(b) Conveyed in or as the result of the peer support counseling
session.
(3) Any communication relating to a peer support counseling session
made confidential under subsection (2) that is made between peer support
specialists, between peer support specialists and the supervisors or
staff of an employee assistance program, or between the supervisors or
staff of an employee assistance program shall be confidential and may not
be disclosed.
(4) Any communication arising out of a peer support counseling
session is not a public record.
(5) Any communication made by a participant or peer support
specialist in a peer support counseling session is not admissible in any
judicial proceeding, administrative proceeding, arbitration proceeding,
or other adjudicatory proceeding. Communications made confidential under
this section shall not be disclosed by the participants in any judicial
proceeding, administrative proceeding, arbitration proceeding, or other
adjudicatory proceeding. The limitations on disclosure imposed by this
subsection include disclosure during any discovery conducted as part of
an adjudicatory proceeding.
(6) Nothing in this section limits the discovery or introduction
-3-

LB804 LB804
2026 2026
into evidence of knowledge acquired by any law enforcement officer or
emergency services personnel from observation made during the course of
employment or material or information acquired during the course of such
employment that is otherwise subject to discovery or introduction into
evidence.
(7) This section does not apply to any:
(a) Threat of suicide or criminal act made by a participant in a
peer support counseling session or any information conveyed in a peer
support counseling session relating to a threat of suicide or criminal
act;
(b) Information relating to abuse or neglect of spouses, children,
or the elderly, or other information that is required to be reported by
law;
(c) Admission of criminal conduct;
(d) Disclosure of testimony by a participant who received peer
support counseling services and expressly consented to such disclosure;
or
(e) Disclosure of testimony by the surviving spouse or executor or
administrator of the estate of a deceased participant who received peer
support counseling services and such surviving spouse, executor, or
administrator expressly consented to such disclosure.
(8) This section does not prohibit any communications between peer
support specialists who conduct peer support counseling sessions, or any
communications between peer support specialists and the supervisors or
staff of an employee assistance program.
(9) This section does not prohibit communications regarding fitness
of an employee for duty between an employee assistance program and an
employer.
-4-